New Jersey, session 222, A4885.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall appoint an individual to serve in each of the departments veterans service offices to assist veterans with State services and programs concerning unemployment, homelessness, and the prevention of veteran suicide.  The appointee shall be a veteran and resident of the county in which the veterans service office is located.  The appointee shall serve in addition to the veterans service officer. The appointee shall devote his entire professional time to the duties of the position and shall receive such salary as may be established by the commissioner with the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  The appointee may perform such additional duties as the commissioner shall assign, but the duties shall not, at any time, interfere with or supersede the appointees primary duties. 2.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.